District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COill:JCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLlThffiL\~T hat iliis
lR act tnaj~ be cited as the ''Elimination and Emblishm.ent of the High1n71y Pian in &pare 5963 ~
19 Lots 801, 802, and 803, S..R 16-00076, Act o,f 2026".
20 Sec. 2. The l\,iayor has proposed to modify the pw1 for the extension ofa permanent
21 system o:fhighvvays ,of the Di.strid ofC-0]umbia C"HighVray Plm1 by removing ftom the
)
Highway Plm a portion of 7th Street, S.E., located on Lots 801, 802, and 803 in Square 5963
23 and by establishing as part of the Highi'iray Plan ii podion of Valley Avenue,, S.E., on Lot 801 in
24 Square 5963', both as sbm:vn on the Surveyor's plat filed under S.R 16-00076.
25 Sec. 3. The Council approves the modifications to the High-rw11y Plan,r eferred to in
26 section 2.
27 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement
28 The Council adopts the, fucal impact statement in 'the committee report as the meal
29 impact statement required by section4a of the. General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,,
30 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat 20.38,~D .C. OfficiaJ Code§ 1-301-47a).
31 Sec. 5. Effective date.

32 This act shall take effect following approval of the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
33 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
34 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
35 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206-02(c)(1), and publication in the District of
36 Columbia Register.

=:DCB
Office of Construction and Building Standards
Office of the Surveyor
CLOSE/DEDICATAE
Chapter 1400ofTitle24, District ofColumbla Municipal Regulations (OCMR)setsforth
regulationsrelated tothe processofclosingstreets and alleys. When an application is
filed, the following information isrequired:
4. Acompleted Surveyor's Office Application Form.
2. A waitten statement bytheabutting property owners in support oftheapplication.
3. Alt Which describes in detail the purposeand natureofthestreet or
closing.
4. Asuitable sketchoftheproposedclosingorthe buildingrestriction lineto be
eliminated.
5. Theinitialfiling feeof$2,750.00" madepayableto the DC Treasurer;
“INCLUDED10%ENHANCEMENT FEE
6. AcompleteRetailTenant Displacementform.
7. POFset ofthe sitedevelopment plans with a copy oftheofficial street, grade,
maporalley gradesheet fortheparticular strest of alley tobeclosed, whenever
{nopurpose isforthe following:
‘As sembly ofproperty forsubsequentsale
Officebuilding
Apartment house/Condominium
Multiplebuildingsite
Commercial utilization
Industrial utilization
Churchaffiliated use
Educational facility
Enhancement ofparking
8. Public hearing and recordation fee of $1,287.00 paid prior topublic hearing date.
Note: tem7abovedoesnotapplytothe District of ColumbiaHousingAuthority: howeverthe
Authorityshallsubmitwiththeapplicationeight(3) copiesoftsapproveddevelopmentguidelines
{forthe particularloestionoftheclosing

✔
5969, 5973, 5960, 5931, 5926, 6125, 5963
See plat
D.C. Department of General Services c/o Eric
DeBear
202-747-0769
edebear@cozen.com

PAR 236
114
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A

PURSUANT TO D.C. CODE 9-101.06, 9-101.12 AND LAW _____________, APPROVED ______________
BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, THE PROPOSED HIGHWAY PLAN SHOWN THUS:
HIGHWAY PLAN TO BE ELIMINATED AND ESTABLISHED
IS HEREBY ELIMINATED FROM THE PERMANENT SYSTEM OF HIGHWAYS. HIGHWAY PLAN TO BE
ESTABLISHED SHOWN THUS:
ON LOTS 801, 802, AND 803, SQUARE 5963
NATIONAL CAPITAL PLANNING COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. _____________________
THE COMMISSION APPROVES THE MODIFICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 9-101.06 and 9-101.12,
OF THE CODE OF LAW FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA.
N85°03'56"E
37.68
P.T.
E.
CHAIRMAN
PI
A V E N U E,
S.
R= A Δ 2 = 7 1 7 9 5 5 3 ° 2 2 . . 7 6 8 6 ' 4 23"
S
0 1 ° 3 6 '0 0 "
E
7 5 .0 0 '
S
I
N
8
N
1
8
5
C
3
1 N
5
°
L
0
3
2
°
O U
.
1
2
7
9
T .
7
'
D
0
5
1
'0
0
'
6 E
0
"
' D
W
"E
7 5 .0 0 '
S01
1
°
6
4
.
5
5
'3
4
0"E
P
SI
S
SI
S
MI
W
Office of the Surveyor, D.C. S
0 H
1
, 2026 3 °
90' A 1 7 .8 8 4 5 ' 3 E E
P ' 0 L
P R 802 " E E
I certify that the plat shown herein is correct and is recorded. R= A 2
Δ
7 = 9 7 1 3 0 4 . 8 ° 7 . 3 6 7 2 7 '09" O X IM A T E S 2 9 ° 4
5
3 3 9 .4
8
R R
'3
5 O
"
E
Δ A
Surveyor, D.C. P P L R AN O P T O O S B E E D E H L I I G M H IN W A A T Y E D F O L O 0 4 A P.C. D
R C A
T
IO 226.92
° 5 9
'2
1
= 5 9
.2
5
,
P.
C. N
S89°25'00"W
" S
.
E
8 E
N55 3 ° 0 0 . 3 8 ' 2 23"E 803 7 T O F 4 S 0 4 0 7 . 9 ° 4 7' 2 8" N 3 7 4 1 2 °3 .4 9 5 '30"E Δ 1 7 ° 5 5 A = 2 1 5 .8 R = 6 9 0 .0 .
H '37 0
P
R O N
2
6
8
5
6
°
.
4
9
0
9 '56"E
2
"
'
N P
2 3 S O S58°15' 00"W
( c o m 5 p ° ) 0 5 ' 0 0 " W 5 6 .4 1 S70° ( c 5 o ( 5 1 c m ' o 0 0 m p 7 0 . ) p 7 " ) 2 W T R E E T S E D 801 PLA ( S c N o 6 m 0° p 2 4 ) 6 9 4 . ' 3 2 0 2 . 0 7 " 2 E S2 ( 8 c 1 ° o . 4 6 m 9 4 ' p 0 ) 0"E
H
N7 ( 7 c ° o 1 3 m 6 5 9 p ' . ) 0 0 0 0"W S 2 5 5 5 0 ° . ( 1 4 c 0 7 o ' m 0 p 0 ) " W (c o m 3 p 2 N ) 4 2 .8 9 4 ° 0 0 '0 0 " W T O B E E L IM IN A T E D IG H W A Y 90' P L A N L O CATI O A N R =
Δ
3 = 5 1 1 9 6 2 . 1 7 ° 8 4 3 O . 4 0 ' F 1 0 9" PRO
Y
PO S E D P A .C V . E N H U IG E HW , A Y S. E. S 4 7 1 2 9 °4 .9 1 6 ' 00" W
E
L
SURVEYOR'S OFFICE, D.C. A T E V A L
M
XI
O
R
P
Made for: ERIC DEBEAR A P HIGHWAY PLAN
TO BE
ESTABLISHED
Drawn by: A.S. Checked by:
Record and computations by: B. MYERS
Recorded at:
Recorded in Survey Book Page SR- 26-00076
Scale: 1 inch = 100 feet
2025/HWY PLAN ELIMINATION/SR-26-00076-SQ.5963

September 3, 2025 Meridith Moldenhauer
Direct Phone 202-747-0763
mmoldenhauer@cozen.com
Eric J. DeBear
Direct Phone 202-747-0769
edebear@cozen.com
Ramón Labrador
Office of the Surveyor, DC Department of Buildings
1100 4th Street SW
Washington, DC 20024
Re: Abandonment of the Highway Plan for 601 Mississippi Ave SE (Parcel 236/114)
Mr. Labrador:
This request is submitted on behalf of the D.C. Department of General Services (“DGS”),
as the implementing agency for the District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”), concerning
the removal of a portion of the “Plan for the Extension of a Permanent Systems of Highways” (the
“Highway Plan”) located within the property of 601 Mississippi Avenue SE (Parcel 236/114) (the
“Property”).1 The Highway Plan consists of a 90-foot-wide portion cutting through the center of
the Property, from the northern lot line along Mississippi Ave SE to the southern lot line along
Valley Ave SE. The Highway Plan is unimproved and not paved. Accordingly, please consider
this request pursuant to D.C. Code § 9-101.01 et seq. to remove the Highway Plan from the
Property.
The subject request is made in connection with DCPS’s plans to renovate and modernize
Hart Middle School (“Hart MS”). A portion of the existing Hart MS building is located within the
area of the Highway Plan. As such, the Highway Plan has not historically been used at the Property
and is not necessary for highway purposes. Absent removal, the Highway Plan would hinder the
planned renovation and modernization of Hart MS. Accordingly, abandonment of the Highway
Plan designation for Mississippi Avenue is appropriate.
Pursuant to D.C. Code § 9-101.06, no less than 30 days prior to the submission of this
request to the National Capital Planning Commission (“NCPC”) and the Council of the District of
Columbia (the “Council”), the Mayor shall provide written notice with an opportunity to submit
comments to the following:
(1) Each owner of land within the squares in which or adjacent to which the
proposed modification is located, by registered mail to the address to which taxation
notifications are sent by the District of Columbia Department of Finance and
Revenue;
1 The Property is owned by the District of Columbia government and managed by DGS.
LEGAL\79747874\21200 19th Street, NW Washington, DC 20036
202.912.4800 800.540.1355 202.861.1905 Fax cozen.com

(2) Advisory Neighborhood Commission 8C (the ANC within which the Property
is located); and
(3) The public, by publishing the proposed modification in the District of Columbia
Register.
Upon expiration of the 30-day notice period, the Office of the Surveyor shall prepare a
resolution for submission to the Council, which shall include all comments received from any
owner of land adjacent to the Property, Advisory Neighborhood Commission 8C, member of the
public, and NCPC. Under D.C. Code § 9-101.06, full agency review is not required for
modifications to the Highway Plan.
Accordingly, enclosed with this letter is the following:
-Application Form
-Draft Plat Illustrating Removal of Highway Plan
The Applicant, as an agency of the District of Columbia, is exempt from the filing fee
requirement of $1,870.00. If you have any further questions about this request, please do not
hesitate to contact me. Thank you for your attention to this matter.
Sincerely,
COZEN O’CONNOR
BY: MERIDITH H. MOLDENHAUER
2
LEGAL\79747874\2

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Transportation
d.Planning and Sustainability Division
To: Joseph Snider
DC Surveyor
Office of the Surveyor, DOB
From: Meredith Soniat
Associate Director
Date: December 22, 2025
Subject: S.O. No. 26-00076 – Proposed Elimination of a Portion of 7th Street SE from DC Highway Plan
The District Department of Transportation (DDOT) has reviewed the application materials provided by the Office
of the Surveyor. The purpose of this memorandum is to provide DDOT’s comments on the proposed Highway
Plan Elimination.
OVERVIEW
The District of Columbia Department of General Services (the “Applicant”) seeks approval to eliminate an
approximately 800-foot segment of 7th Street SE from the Plan of a Permanent System of Highways of the
District of Columbia (the “DC Highway Plan”) to facilitate the renovation of Hart Middle School. The portion of
7th Street SE to be eliminated from the DC Highway Plan is a 90-foot-wide portion cutting through the center of
601 Mississippi Avenue SE (Lots 801-803, Square 5963) as shown in Figure 1 below. It is noted that the 800-foot
section called for in the DC Highway Plan for this segment is not currently DDOT right-of-way, and thus, no right-
of-way needs to be closed. Additionally, DDOT has no plans to extend 7th Street SE southward, and it would be
adjacent to and redundant to Wheeler Road SE.
A portion of the existing Hart Middle School building is located within the area of the Highway Plan. As such, the
Highway Plan has not historically been used at the property and is not necessary for highway purposes. Absent
removal, the Highway Plan would hinder the planned renovation and modernization of Hart Middle School.
RECOMMENDATION
DDOT has determined that there is no longer a transportation need for the DC Highway Plan designation on 7th
Street SE and does not object to its elimination, as shown in Figure 1 below.
District Department of Transportation | 250 M Street SE, Washington, DC 20003 | 202.673.6813 | ddot.dc.gov

S.O. No. 26-00076 – Elimination of a Portion of 7th Street SE from DC Highway Plan
Figure 1 | Proposed Removal of 7th Street SE from DC Highway Plan
Source: Office of the Surveyor
MS:pj
2

MEMORANDUM
TO: Ramón Labrador, Deputy Surveyor, Office of the Surveyor
Department of Buildings
FROM: Philip Isaiah, Development Review Specialist, Office of Planning
Joel Lawson, Associate Director, Development Review, Office of Planning
DATE: January 9, 2026
SUBJECT: S.O. 26-00076 – 601 Mississippi Ave, SE
Proposed Closing of Public Street
I. RECOMMENDATION
The Office of Planning (OP) has completed its review of the application for the requested street closing,
and has no objection to this request.
II. REQUEST
To close the unimproved 90 foot wide public street that runs between Mississippi Ave, SE and Valley
Ave, SE, as shown in the map below.
phone 202-442-7600, fax 202-535-2497
www.planning.dc.gov Find us on Facebook or follow us on Twitter @OPinDC

OP Report on Street Closing Request, S.O. 26-00076, Square 5963; Lots 801, 802 & 803
January 9, 2026 Page 2 of 4
III. SITE DESCRIPTION
Address: 601 Mississippi Ave, SE
Applicant: District of Columbia, Department of General Services
Legal Description: Square 5963; Lots 801, 802 & 803
Ward / ANC: Ward 8 / ANC 8C
Zone: RA-1 (Residential and compatible institutional uses)
The subject application would close an unimproved, 90-foot-wide
Description: portion of the public street right-of-way that runs between
Mississippi Ave, SE and Valley Ave, SE
Size: Approximately 71,300 sq ft.
The owners of the subject property are also the owners of the
following abutting properties:
Adjacent Ownership:
• Parcel 236, Lot 99
• Parcel 243, Lot 58
The applicant proposes to renovate and modernize the existing
Proposed Development: Hart Middle School, located on lot 803, which would encompass a
portion of the right-of-way.
a. Public Space and Safety
24 DCMR, Chapter 14, the street and alley closing regulations, requires submission of the following:
…
(d) A listing of all properties (land and buildings) associated with the proposed closing;
Lots 801, 802, and 803 are associated with the proposed street closure. The undeveloped
Lot 801 contains a portion of Oxon Run Park, operated by the District Department of
Parks and Recreation (DPR) and a portion of the Oxon Run tributary to the Potomac
River. The Oxon Run Trail traverses the northern portion of the lot. Lot 802 is developed
with the Southeast Tennis and Learning Center, also operated by DPR, containing both
indoor and outdoor tennis courts. Lot 803 is developed with the Charles Hart Middle
School, operated by the District of Columbia Public Schools (DCPS), which is partially
located in the subject right-of-way and whose renovation is spurring the proposed
closure.
(e) A listing of the name and location of each retail tenant that will be displaced because of
the demolition, substantial rehabilitation, or discontinuance of an existing building that
is associated with the closing;
No retail uses are located on any lot affected by the street closure.
24 DCMR § 1400.8 requires the site development plan to include the following so that reviewing
agencies can determine the potential impact of the requested closing:
(a) The Office of the Surveyor's application file number;
SO 26-00076.

OP Report on Street Closing Request, S.O. 26-00076, Square 5963; Lots 801, 802 & 803
January 9, 2026 Page 3 of 4
(b) A key location sketch showing the development in relationship to the square and surrounding
streets, with the streets identified;
(c) Footprint or outline of each building of the proposed development;
(d) The street names;
(e) The alley or street or portion thereof proposed to be closed; and the location and dimensions of
any dedication or easement proposed, along with a clear statement of the purposes for the
easement;
(f) The approximate gross floor areas intended for various uses such as retail, office, residential,
industrial, and commercial;
(g) The points of ingress and egress that vehicles will use for parking or loading purposes;
(h) The location of off-street parking spaces and their number and size;
(i) The location and size of loading and unloading facilities such as berths, docks, and platforms;
(j) Tracking diagram for the maximum size trucks intended to use the loading and unloading
facilities;
(k) Elevation views for each side of any building proposed for the site; and
(l) A profile drawing of the easement to clearly show the proposed surface grade of the easement
and the ceiling level of any building to be constructed over the easement.
While the Applicant has not provided a development plan with the subject application, per the
Applicant’s burden of proof, no additional development is proposed outside of the modernization
efforts of the existing building on the site.
IV. OP ANALYSIS
a. Planning and Urban Design
The Director of the Office of Planning is required to “determine whether the proposed closing is in
compliance with the District’s planning and urban design objectives”, as per 24 DCMR 1401.2(c).
The site is within an area designated on the Comprehensive Plan Future Land Use Map (FLUM) for
Local Public Facilities (LPUB) and Parks, Recreation, and Open Space (PROS) development,
and on the Generalized Policy Map (GPM) as Institutional Uses and Parks.
The planning and urban design objectives, as contained within the Comprehensive Plan (10 DCMR),
that would be relevant to the proposed closure of the unimproved segment of road right of way
include:
Land Use Element
Policy LU-1.4.9: Public Facilities
Encourage the siting (or retention and modernization) of public facilities, such as schools, libraries,
and government offices, near transit stations and along transit corridors. Such facilities should be a
focus for community activities and enhance neighborhood identity.
The applicant proposes to modernize the school located on lot 803. Closure of the subject right-of-way
would accommodate the proposed modernization.
Far Southeast/Southwest Area Element
The site is within the Far Southeast/Southwest Area Element

OP Report on Street Closing Request, S.O. 26-00076, Square 5963; Lots 801, 802 & 803
January 9, 2026 Page 4 of 4
Policy FSS-1.1.12: School Modernization
Strongly support the modernization of schools in the Far Southeast/ Southwest Planning Area.
Plans for additional housing should be accompanied by a commitment to improving educational
facilities to meet current and future needs and recognizing that education is among the
community’s highest priorities. (1808.13)
The subject street closure is proposed to accommodate the modernization of an existing public
school that is partially located on the subject right-of-way.
V. CONCLUSION
The information provided by the applicant is generally adequate to meet the requirements of 14 DCMR §
1400.8.
The District Department of Transportation (DDOT) has indicated to OP that it has no objection to the
granting of the street closure request.
As such, OP has no objection to the proposed street closing, as it is not inconsistent with the
Comprehensive Plan direction.

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
MEMORANDUM
TO: Ramón O. Labrador
Interim Surveyor, DC
Office of Surveyor, DOB
FROM: Anthony G. Lee
Supervisory Construction Analyst
Developer Finance Div., DHCD
DATE: January 14, 2026
SUBJECT: Abandonment of the Highway Plan for 601 Mississippi Ave SE in Square 5963, On
Lots 801, 802 and 803, Parcel 236/114(File No: S.R. 26-00076)
Thank you for contacting the DC Department of Housing and Community Development
(DHCD) regarding the requested abandonment of the highway plan for 601 Mississippi Ave, SE,
on Lots 801, 802 and 803 in Square 5963. The Applicants, DGS and DCPS have commissioned
Cozen O’Connor to submit, on their behalf, an application to remove a portion of the “Plan for
the Extension of a Permanent System of Highways.” The Highway Plan consists of a 90-foot-wide
portion cutting through the center of the Property, from the northern lot line along Mississippi Ave
SE to the southern lot line along Valley Ave SE. The Highway Plan is unimproved and not paved.
The subject square is bounded by Mississippi Ave., SE to the north, Wheeler Rd., SE to the east,
Valley Ave., SE to the South in Southeast DC. We appreciate the opportunity to review and
provide input on this abandonment request, relative to any potential impact on future housing
development projects associated with DHCD in the vicinity of Square 5963.
DHCD has reviewed the included “SR-26-00076-SQ.5963 – Draft Plat,” “Cover Letter – Highway
Plan Removal,” and “Highway Plan Elimination Application.” DHCD finds no adverse impact to
any current or proposed future development projects. DHCD takes no exception or objection
regarding this plan revision/abandonment application. Our agency’s affirmative support for this
proposed abandonment is based upon our review of the documents provided.
Department of Housing and Community Development | 1909 Martin Luther King, Jr. Avenue, SE, Washington, DC 20020 | 202.442.7200
dhcd.dc.gov

MEMORANDUM
TO: Ramon Labrador, Acting DC Surveyor
SUBJECT: Proposed Highway Plan Elimination in Square 5963; (S.O. 26-00076)
DATE: December 11, 2025
Thank you for contacting the DC Historic Preservation Office regarding the above-referenced
Highway Plan elimination. We appreciate the opportunity to review this action. However, § 9-
202.02(4) of the D.C. Code only requires the Mayor to refer applications “to close any street located
on the L’Enfant Street Plan” to the Historic Preservation Review Board. We have no comment on
this proposed action since it does not involve the closure of a L’Enfant Street.
BY: _______________________________
C. Andrew Lewis
Senior Historic Preservation Specialist
DC State Historic Preservation Office
26-0137
899 North Capitol Street, Suite 7100, Washington, DC 20002 Phone: 202-442-7600

Government of the District of Columbia
Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department
Muriel Bowser John A. Donnelly, Sr.
Mayor Fire and EMS Chief
FIRE PREVENTION DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Ramon Labrador
Office of Surveyor
FROM: Tony A. White, II
DCFEMS / Fire Marshal’s Office
DATE: December 24, 2025
RE: Highway Plan Abandonment for 601 Mississippi Ave SE (Parcel 236/114)
This correspondence is being forwarded to your office to address the request for Abandonment of
the Highway Plan for 601 Mississippi Ave SE (Parcel 236/114), as submitted to The Office of the
Fire Marshal for review.
Based on our review The Office of the Fire Marshal has no objection to this request. However, the
applicant is to ensure that all other fire department access and service feature requirements are in
accordance with DCMR 12-H Fire Code Supplement, 2017 edition, and the International Fire
Code, 2015 edition.
If you have any questions or concerns, please do not hesitate to contact my office on (202) 727-
3298.
Sincerely,
Tony A. White, II
BFC/ Assistant Fire Marshal
DC Fire – Fire Marshal’s Office
Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center phone: (202) 673–3320
2000 14th Street, NW, Suite 500 facsimile: (202) 462–0807
Washington, DC 20009 website: fems.dc.gov

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Department of Public Works
Solid Waste Management Administration
MEMORANDUM
To: Tamara Bell, Program Support Specialist Department
of Buildings
From: Steven Thompson Jr,
Associate Administrator DPW, SWMA
Subject: S.O. 26-00076 Highway Plan Removal Par. 236
Date: Friday, February 27, 2026
The Department has reviewed the request for S.O. 26-00076 Highway Plan Removal Par. 236. At this
time, the department has no concerns about the closure. It will not have any impact on the residential
collection in this area.
This project will not cause a negative environmental impact if project developers and owners are
following applicable laws and regulations governing solid waste management during all phases of the
project.
District laws require that the property and the abutting public space be maintained daily
free of litter, dust management, and debris and that all solid waste be properly
containerized and removed at sufficient frequency by a licensed solid waste Collector.
CONTACT DPW
If you have any questions regarding this determination, you can contact Steven Thompson by email at
steven.thompson@dc.gov or by telephone at (202) 645-7190.
Steven Thompson
Associate Administrator
Solid Waste Education and Enforcement Program (SWEEP)
District Department of Public Works

401 9th Street, NW North Lobby, Suite 500 Washington, DC 20004 Tel 202.482.7200 Fax 202.482.7272 www.ncpc.gov
IN REPLY REFER TO:
NCPC File No. 8725
December 31, 2025
Diana Dorsey
District of Columbia Department of Buildings, Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street, SW
Washington, DC 20024
Re: 8725 (Highway Plan Amendment at Square 5963, Lots 801-803 - S.O. 26-00076)
Dear Diana Dorsey:
The purpose of this letter is to respond to the above-mentioned project submitted to the National Capital
Planning Commission (NCPC) for review, in accordance with DC Code § 9-103.02.
Upon review of the project documents, NCPC staff has determined that the proposed project falls under an
exception listed in Chapter 8 (Exceptions and Project Changes) of NCPC’s submission guidelines. In
particular, the project meets the requirements of exception 9, which include the amendments to the Highway
Plan that do not have a negative impact on federal property, and cause no environmental impacts including
adverse effects on historic properties. The project was also made available for public review on the NCPC
website and no comments were received. Accordingly, staff has determined that this project is exempt from
Commission review.
This determination applies only to the project listed above. Determinations to whether a particular project
falls within one of the Commission’s exceptions are done on a case-by-case basis, either during early
consultation or upon request for review. Please note that the applicant cannot make this determination
independently and must submit projects to NCPC to confirm that an exception is warranted.
If you have any questions or need additional information, please contact Stephanie Free at (202) 482-7209
or stephanie.free@ncpc.gov.
Sincerely,
Matthew Flis
Deputy Director, Current Planning Division

6801 Industrial Road
Springfield, Virginia 22151
December 2, 2025
Mr. Ramón O. Labrador
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street, S.W., Room E320
Washington, D.C. 20024
Re: Proposed Elimination of the Highway Plan in Square 5963 – S.O. 26-00076
Mr. Labrador,
I have reviewed the elimination of the highway plan application in the subject location detailed in
the attachments to the subject application. After reviewing the area, it has been determined that
Washington Gas does not have active natural gas facilities within the limits of the proposed area which
will be impacted by this proposal. Washington Gas approves the elimination of the highway plan at this
location.
Should you have any questions or concerns regarding these facilities, you may contact me at the
contact information provided below.
Sincerely,
Andrés del Campo
Washington Gas
Engineer II, Distribution Engineering
andres.delcampo@washgas.com
Mobile: 571-609-1868

A pepco
A PHI Company
2112/2026
Diana Dorsey
‘The DepartmentofBuilding
RE: S.O. 26-00076 —Proposed Highway Removal
Dear Ms. Dorsey,
Pepco has reviewedthe drawingsand conducted afield visit, which concludesthatthe proposed highway
removal requestmay proceed, because Pepcohas notidentified anything thatbelongsto us atthis site.
Sincerely, :
ie McCray
Pepco~Manager Distribution Engineering
Pepco + 701 Ninth StreetNW+WashingtonDC20068-0001 + 202-833-7500+pepco.com

12/01/2025
Mr.
Office of the Surveyor
11004thStreetSW
Washington,DC.
200
Re: Abandonment of the Highway Plan for 601 Mississippi Ave SE (Parcel 236/114)
Verizon Washington D.C. Inc. does not object to thisAbandonment of the
Highway Plan for 601 Mississippi Ave SE (Parcel 236/114)
Yourssincerely,
Kenny Young
Verizon OSPEngineering

dcé
water is life" David L. Gadis, ChiefExecutive Officer
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIAWATER AND SEWER AUTHORITY | 1385 CANAL STREET, SE | WASHINGTON, DC 20003
To: — Ramon Labrador, DC Surveyor
DC Department of Buildings
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street, S-W4th Floor
Washington, DC 20024
From: Gordon Chike
Easement and Covenant Specialist
Date: December 10, 2025
Re: — S.0. 26-0076 - Highway Plan Elimination in Square 5963
Dear Mr. Labrador:
The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (DC Water) is in receipt ofthe application and
plans forwarded to usforcomments on November25", 2025, regarding S.. 26-0076: the
abandonment of Highway Plan in Square 5963. The proposed elimination ofthe Highway Plan on
Lots 801, 802, and 803 of Square 5963, will not hinder current operation and/or maintenance
efforts to the facilities located within said lots. Therefore, DC Water has no objection to the
proposed action ofeliminating the Highway Plan as requested in S.O. 26-0076.
Ifyou need additional information, | can be reached at the contact information listed below.
Regards,
Gordon Chike
Easement Covent Coordinator
gordon.chike@dcwater.com
202.787.2191
dewater.com

From: DeBear, Eric J.
To: Dorsey, Diana (DOB); Lagana, Mark (DOB); Bell, Tamara (DOB)
Cc: Moldenhauer, Meridith; Bradley, Zachary
Subject: FW: Follow-Up: Request for Comments – S.O. 26-00076
Date: Wednesday, February 4, 2026 1:16:54 PM
CAUTION: This email originated from outside of the DC Government. Do not click on links or open attachments unless
you recognize the sender and know that the content is safe. If you believe that this email is suspicious, please forward to
phishing@dc.gov for additional analysis by OCTO Security Operations Center (SOC).
Diana and Mark,
Please see the below comments provided by ANC 8C with respect to the Highway Removal
application under S.O. 26-00076.
Eric DeBear
Member | Cozen O'Connor
. 2001 M Street NW, Ste. 500 | Washington, DC 20036
O: 202-747-0769 C: 617-909-1052
Email | Bio | Map | cozen.com
From: Adofo, Salim (SMD 8C07) <8C07@anc.dc.gov>
Sent: Wednesday, February 4, 2026 1:08 PM
To: Bradley, Zachary <ZBradley@cozen.com>
Cc: DeBear, Eric J. <EDeBear@cozen.com>
Subject: Re: Follow-Up: Request for Comments – S.O. 26-00076
**EXTERNAL SENDER**
Greetings,
On behalf of Advisory Neighborhood Commission (ANC) 8C, I am writing to formally express
our support for the request by the District of Columbia Department of General Services (DGS), on
behalf of the District of Columbia Public Schools (DCPS), to abandon a portion of the “Plan for
the Extension of a Permanent System of Highways” affecting the property located at 601
Mississippi Avenue SE (Parcel 236/114).
ANC 8C understands that the existing Highway Plan designation includes an approximately 90-
foot-wide unimproved and unpaved corridor that cuts through the center of the property, extending
from Mississippi Avenue SE to Valley Avenue SE. This designation has never been used for
highway purposes and has no practical transportation function at this location.
The Commission further understands that the subject request is directly connected to DCPS’s
planned renovation and modernization of Charles R. Hart Middle School. A portion of the existing
Hart Middle School building is located within the area designated under the Highway Plan, and
maintaining this outdated designation would unnecessarily hinder the modernization project, delay
critical school improvements, and limit DCPS’s ability to fully utilize publicly owned land for
educational purposes.

ANC 8C strongly supports the renovation and modernization of Hart Middle School, which serves
students and families in Ward 8. The removal of this obsolete Highway Plan designation will help
ensure that the project can move forward efficiently, safely, and in a manner that best supports
students, educators, and the surrounding community.
Given that:
The Highway Plan is unimproved, unused, and unnecessary for transportation purposes;
The property is publicly owned and managed by DGS;
The abandonment would facilitate critical public-school infrastructure investment; and
The proposed action is consistent with D.C. Code § 9-101.01 et seq. and the procedures
outlined in D.C. Code § 9-101.06,
ANC 8C finds that the abandonment of the Highway Plan at this location is appropriate,
reasonable, and in the best interest of the community.
Accordingly, ANC 8C respectfully urges the Office of the Surveyor, the National Capital Planning
Commission, and the Council of the District of Columbia to approve the abandonment of the
Highway Plan designation for 601 Mississippi Avenue SE as requested.
Thank you for the opportunity to provide comment on this matter and for your continued work to
support responsible planning and public investment in Ward 8. Please do not hesitate to contact
ANC 8C should you require additional information.
Collective Work & Responsibility. Improving Our Community Together
Salim Adofo
Chairperson
Advisory Neighborhood Commission 8C
Commissioner District 8C07
2730 Martin Luther King Jr. Ave Se
Washington DC 20032
(202) 579-0586
From: Bradley, Zachary <ZBradley@cozen.com>
Sent: Friday, January 23, 2026 11:15 AM
To: Adofo, Salim (SMD 8C07) <8C07@anc.dc.gov>
Cc: ANC 8C Office (ANC 8C) <8C@anc.dc.gov>; DeBear, Eric J. <EDeBear@cozen.com>
Subject: FW: Follow-Up: Request for Comments – S.O. 26-00076
CAUTION: This email originated from outside of the DC Government. Do not click on links or open attachments unless
you recognize the sender and know that the content is safe. If you believe that this email is suspicious, please forward to
phishing@dc.gov for additional analysis by OCTO Security Operations Center (SOC).
Some people who received this message don't often get email from

zbradley@cozen.com. Learn why this is important
Good morning Commissioner Adofo,
It was nice speaking with you the other day. I wanted to follow up regarding the status of the
ANC’s review of the Hart MS Highway Plan removal request?
Best,
Zak
Zachary Bradley
Associate | Cozen O'Connor
2001 M Street NW, Suite 500 | Washington, DC 20036
Pronouns: He, Him, His
P: 202-280-6451 | F: 202-742-2531
Email | Map | cozen.com
Notice: This communication, including attachments, may contain information that is confidential
and protected by the attorney/client or other privileges. It constitutes non-public information
intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s). If the reader or recipient of this
communication is not the intended recipient, an employee or agent of the intended recipient who
is responsible for delivering it to the intended recipient, or you believe that you have received
this communication in error, please notify the sender immediately by return e-mail and promptly
delete this e-mail, including attachments without reading or saving them in any manner. The
unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution, or reproduction of this e-mail, including
attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful. Receipt by anyone other than the intended
recipient(s) is not a waiver of any attorney/client or other privilege.
Notice: This communication, including attachments, may contain information that is confidential
and protected by the attorney/client or other privileges. It constitutes non-public information
intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s). If the reader or recipient of this
communication is not the intended recipient, an employee or agent of the intended recipient who
is responsible for delivering it to the intended recipient, or you believe that you have received
this communication in error, please notify the sender immediately by return e-mail and promptly
delete this e-mail, including attachments without reading or saving them in any manner. The
unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution, or reproduction of this e-mail, including
attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful. Receipt by anyone other than the intended
recipient(s) is not a waiver of any attorney/client or other privilege.

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Parker Houston
Legislative Affairs Advisor, Office of the Director
The Department of Buildings
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: March 23, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Elimination and Establishment of the Highway Plan for
Square 5963, Lots 801, 802 & 803, S.R. 26-00076, Act of 2026 (AE-26-213)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This memorandum responds to your request that the Office of the Attorney General conduct a legal
sufficiency review of the above-referenced legislation.
The legislation would order the eliminate and establish a portion of 7th Street, S.E., located on Lots 801,
802 and 803 in Square 5963.1
The legislation, which incorporates changes we recommended and you approved, is legally sufficient. There
are additional requirements under the relevant portions of the D.C. code legislation that should be fulfilled
prior to submission to the council. You should enclose the attached certificate, the Mayor’s transmittal
letter, and a fiscal impact statement prepared by the Office of the Chief Financial Officer when you forward
your legislative package to the Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs. The attached certificate only applies
to the draft of the legislation we reviewed. If you make substantive changes to the draft, you should send it
back to us for a new legal sufficiency review. If you have any questions regarding this memorandum, please
contact Rohin Balkundi, Assistant Attorney General, Legal Counsel Division, at 202-262-3014, or me at
(202) 262-6402.
AME/rb
1 This legal sufficiency determination is limited to the Resolution. This Office has not reviewed the underlying land records.
Our legal sufficiency determination relies on the representations about those records made by the Department of Buildings.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: March 23, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Elimination and Establishment of the Highway Plan for
Square 5963, Lots 801, 802 & 803, S.R. 26-00076, Act of 2026 (AE-26-213)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: April 15, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Elimination and Establishment of the
Highway Plan for Square 5963, Lots 801, 802 & 803, S.R. 26-00076, Act
of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on March 25,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the proposed fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through
fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
The bill amends the District’s highway plan1 to eliminate a stretch of 7th Street, S.E. that, in the plan,
runs from Mississippi Avenue, S.E. to Valley Avenue, S.E. between Charles Hart Middle School and the
Southeast Tennis and Learning Center.2 The approximately 71,000 square feet of land is not built out
and is not functional right-of-way for transportation purposes. The elimination of 7th Street, S.E. will
allow the Department of General Services to move forward with a modernization project of the
adjacent Charles Hart Middle School, which is planned to start construction in 2026.
The bill also establishes a small segment of roadway in the highway plan to ensure continuity of
Valley Avenue, S.E. in the highway plan once 7th Street, S.E. is eliminated.
1 An act to provide a permanent system of highways in that part of the District of Columbia lying outside of
the cities, approved June 28, 1898 (30 Stat. 520; D.C. Official Code § 9-101.06).
2 7th Street, S.E. in the plan runs through the properties known for assessment and tax purposes as Square
5963, Lots 801m 802, and 803.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Elimination and Establishment of the Highway Plan for Square 5963, Lots 801, 802 & 803, S.R. 26-
00076, Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as Provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on March 25, 2026
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the proposed fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through
fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The District does not use and has no
future plans to use the land for transportation purposes. The bill’s elimination of this portion of 7th
Street, S.E. from the District’s highway plan has no impact on the budget or financial plan.
Page 2 of 2